dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
<dictionary>

  <alphabet>ئعابپتٹثجچحخدڈذرڑزژسشصضطظعغفقکگلمنوہ,ھءیےيں</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="adj" c=""/>
    <sdef n="adv" c=""/>
    <sdef n="cas" c=""/>
    <sdef n="caus1" c=""/>
    <sdef n="caus2" c=""/>
    <sdef n="comp" c=""/>
    <sdef n="conj" c=""/>
    <sdef n="dem" c=""/>
    <sdef n="dst" c=""/>
    <sdef n="f" c=""/>
    <sdef n="f1" c=""/>
    <sdef n="f2" c=""/>
    <sdef n="f3" c=""/>
    <sdef n="fam" c=""/>
    <sdef n="fut" c=""/>
    <sdef n="ij" c=""/>
    <sdef n="impf" c=""/>
    <sdef n="ind" c=""/>
    <sdef n="inf" c=""/>
    <sdef n="inf1" c=""/>
    <sdef n="inf2" c=""/>
    <sdef n="inf3" c=""/>
    <sdef n="itg" c=""/>
    <sdef n="m" c=""/>
    <sdef n="mf" c=""/>
    <sdef n="n" c=""/>
    <sdef n="neg" c=""/>
    <sdef n="nom" c=""/>
    <sdef n="num" c=""/>
    <sdef n="obl" c=""/>
    <sdef n="obl1" c=""/>
    <sdef n="obl2" c=""/>
    <sdef n="obl3" c=""/>
    <sdef n="p1" c=""/>
    <sdef n="p2" c=""/>
    <sdef n="p3" c=""/>
    <sdef n="part" c=""/>
    <sdef n="past" c=""/>
    <sdef n="perf" c=""/>
    <sdef n="pers" c=""/>
    <sdef n="pl" c=""/>
    <sdef n="pn" c=""/>
    <sdef n="pnf" c=""/>
    <sdef n="pol" c=""/>
    <sdef n="pos" c=""/>
    <sdef n="post" c=""/>
    <sdef n="pres" c=""/>
    <sdef n="prn" c=""/>
    <sdef n="prs" c=""/>
    <sdef n="prx" c=""/>
    <sdef n="qst" c=""/>
    <sdef n="ref" c=""/>
    <sdef n="rel" c=""/>
    <sdef n="root" c=""/>
    <sdef n="root1" c=""/>
    <sdef n="root2" c=""/>
    <sdef n="root3" c=""/>
    <sdef n="sg" c=""/>
    <sdef n="sint" c=""/>
    <sdef n="spost" c=""/>
    <sdef n="sup" c=""/>
    <sdef n="vaux" c=""/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c=""/>
    <sdef n="vcaus1" c=""/>
    <sdef n="vcaus2" c=""/>
    <sdef n="vf" c=""/>
    <sdef n="vf1" c=""/>
    <sdef n="vf2" c=""/>
    <sdef n="vf3" c=""/>
    <sdef n="voc" c=""/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="numeros">    
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="کنی/ا__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>اں</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>وں</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="چِڑْیا"><i>چِڑْی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="گڑیا"><i>گڑی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="چنیا"><i>چنی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="پڑیا"><i>پڑی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹکیا"><i>ٹکی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ندیا"><i>ندی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="کنیا"><i>کنی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="گُڑْیا"><i>گُڑْی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="بُڑْھیا"><i>بُڑْھی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈبیا"><i>ڈبی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈِبْیا"><i>ڈِبْی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="بوڑھیا"><i>بوڑھی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ہنڈیا"><i>ہنڈی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="چڑیا"><i>چڑی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="لونڈیا"><i>لونڈی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="آسانیا"><i>آسانی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n_f"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
